Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB23.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 532 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) Any person who has been convicted of, pled guilty to, or entered an Alford
plea to a sex crime, as defined in KRS 17.500, in which the victim was
under the age of twelve (12) at the time of the commission of the offense
shall undergo medroxyprogesterone acetate treatment or its chemical
equivalent, in addition to any other penalties.
(b) The court shall designate in its judgment if the victim was under the age of
twelve (12) at the time of the commission of the offense.
(2) A person shall begin medroxyprogesterone acetate treatment no later than one (1)
month prior to his or her release from custody. Treatment shall:
(a) Be administered by the Department of Corrections or any entity with whom
the department contracts to provide treatment; and
(b) Continue until the person is released from probation, parole, or
postincarceration supervision.
(3) (a) A person shall pay for all of the costs associated with medroxyprogesterone
acetate treatment unless the person is determined to be a needy or indigent
person under KRS Chapter 31.
(b) If a person is determined to be a needy or indigent person under KRS
Chapter 31:
1. The Commonwealth shall pay for all of the costs associated with
medroxyprogesterone acetate treatment; and
2. A periodic review of the person's status as a needy or indigent person
may be conducted by the court upon motion by the Commonwealth's
attorney.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 12/17/2024 11:17 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 66
(4) Prior to the administration of medroxyprogesterone acetate, the person shall:
(a) Be evaluated by a licensed physician to determine if the person is an
appropriate candidate for treatment;
(b) Be informed about the effect of the treatment and any side effects that may
result; and
(c) Authorize the release of all medical records related to the evaluation under
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(5) A person receiving treatment under this section shall authorize the release of all
medical records, including the record of the evaluation completed under
subsection (4) of this section, relating to the medroxyprogesterone acetate
treatment to the Department of Corrections.
(6) Any person who intentionally violates this section may be reincarcerated for:
(a) The remaining period of the person's initial sentence, if any is remaining;
and
(b) The entire period of postincarceration supervision or, if the initial sentence
has been served, for the remaining period of postincarceration supervision.
(7) The Department of Corrections shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 12/17/2024 11:17 AM Jacketed